Idaho, session 2025, H0081.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 16, Title 36, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 36-1605, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
36-1605. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY OF RECREATION CLUBS AND THEIR MEM-
BERS. (1) Statement of Purpose. The purpose of this section is to encour-
age the formation of recreation clubs and participation in recreation activ-
ities organized by recreation clubs by limiting the liability of members of
recreation clubs.
(2) Definitions. As used in this section:
(a) "Club member" includes any member, officer, director, or volunteer
of a recreation club that receives no wage for personal services ren-
dered to the recreation club.
(b) "Participant" includes any person, whether novice, amateur, or
professional, who engages in a recreation activity coordinated, facil-
itated, organized, promoted, or supported by a recreation club, whether
or not the participant is a member of the recreation club.
(c) "Recreation activity" or "recreation activities" means the pursuit
of personal enjoyment or pleasure on or in land, air, or water when done
without charge or fee payable to the recreation club or a club member,
including but not limited to any of the following activities or any
combination thereof: hunting, fishing, shooting, trapping, swimming,
boating, rafting, tubing, camping, picnicking, hiking, pleasure driv-
ing, the flying of aircraft, bicycling, running, playing on playground
equipment, nature study or observation, water skiing, animal rid-
ing, motorcycling, snowmobiling, operating recreational vehicles and
off-highway vehicles, winter sports, viewing or enjoying historical,
archaeological, scenic, geological or scientific sites, and traveling
across or being upon the land, air, or water incidental to or ancil-
lary to any of the recreational purposes described in this subsection.
Membership dues in, and donations to, a recreation club shall not be
considered a charge or fee for a recreation activity.
(d) "Recreation club" means an unincorporated association formed pur-
suant to chapter 27, title 30, Idaho Code, or a nonprofit corporation
organized pursuant to chapter 30, title 30, Idaho Code, that has among


its purposes the coordination, facilitation, organization, participa-
tion, promotion, or support of recreation activities.
(3) Limitation of Liability of Recreation Clubs. Except as provided in
subsection (4), a recreation club and a club member shall not be liable for
any injury to or the death of a participant engaged in a recreation activity,
and no participant nor participant's representative or survivor may main-
tain an action against or recover from a recreation club or a club member for
any injury to or the death of a participant engaged in a recreation activity.
(4) Exceptions. The limitation of liability set forth in subsection
(3) shall not apply in the following instances:
(a) With respect to a recreation club where the recreation club pro-
vides equipment to the participant and the provided equipment is the di-
rect and proximate cause of the injury to or death of the participant;
(b) With respect to a club member where the club member provides equip-
ment to the participant and the provided equipment is the direct and
proximate cause of the injury to or death of the participant;
(c) With respect to a club member where the club member commits an act or
omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful and wanton disre-
gard for the safety of the participant and that act or omission is the
direct and proximate cause of the injury or death;
(d) With respect to a club member where the club member intentionally
injures the participant;
(e) With respect to a club member where the club member fails to ex-
ercise ordinary care in the club member's own participation in the
recreation activity and such failure is the direct and proximate cause
of the injury to or the death of the participant. The mere fact that
the club member coordinated, facilitated, organized, participated in,
promoted, or supported the recreation activity shall not, in itself,
be sufficient to constitute a failure to exercise ordinary care where
there is no other basis for liability;
(f) Under the liability provisions as set forth in the products liabil-
ity laws; or
(g) Under the liability provisions set forth in chapter 9, title 6;
chapter 11, title 6; chapter 12, title 6; chapter 18, title 6; chapter
27, title 6; chapter 29, title 6; or chapter 33, title 6, Idaho Code.
(5) Limitation of Duties. A recreation club and a club member has no
duty to eliminate, alter, control, or lessen the risks inherent with recre-
ation activities. A recreation club and a club member owe no duty of care to
make any recreation activity safe for a participant. A participant who takes
part in a recreation activity assumes all risks inherent in that activity.
(6) Waiver of Negligence Claims. Any participant may, by express writ-
ten consent, prospectively waive negligence claims against a recreation
club and a club member. It is the policy of this state that such written
liability waivers are enforceable to the same degree as similar waivers for
other activities.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.